Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 10
COLORADO NATURAL AREAS

36-10-101 to 36-10-113. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article repealed, p. 1180, § 4, effective March 23.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1977. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning Colorado natural areas, see article 33 of title 33.